North Carolina, session 2025, SB834.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of the Charter of the Town of Bolivia, as reactivated by
Chapter 366 of the 1961 Session Laws, and pursuant to the Town Resolution adopted on October
14, 2025, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2. On the first Monday in May 1963, and biennially thereafter, there Municipal
elections in the Town of Bolivia shall be held in even-numbered years, at which time there shall
be elected a mayor and four aldermen who shall take office on the first Tuesday in May next
succeeding their election and shall hold office for two years and until their successors are elected
and qualified. The said elections shall be held and conducted under the provisions of Article 3 of
Chapter 160 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. The terms of the mayor and members of the board of aldermen in the
Town of Bolivia set to expire in 2027 shall be reduced by one year to expire in 2026. Regular
municipal elections in the Town of Bolivia shall be conducted in 2026 and biennially thereafter.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*S834-v-1*